Hawaii statutes.
§671-16.5 Arbitration; subsequent
litigation. Any person or the person's representative claiming that a
medical tort has been committed or any health care provider against whom an
inquiry has been made may elect to bypass the court annexed arbitration program
under section 601-20 after the inquiry has been submitted to the medical
inquiry and conciliation panel and the panel has been terminated pursuant to
section 671-15 if the party meaningfully participated in panel proceedings, an
alternative dispute resolution process has been terminated pursuant to section
671-16.6, or the panel or alternative dispute resolution process has not
completed proceedings within the tolling period of the statute of limitations
under section 671-18. [L 1989, c 280, §2; am L 2012, c 296, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next